Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.126

Liability of members and managers to third parties.

(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the debts, obligations, and liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, are solely the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited liability company; and no member or manager of a limited liability company is obligated personally for any such debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability company solely by reason of being or acting as a member or manager respectively of the limited liability company.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, under a limited liability company agreement or under another agreement, a member or manager may agree to be obligated personally for any or all of the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited liability company.

(3) A member or manager of a limited liability company is personally liable for such person's own torts.

[ 2015 c 188 s 27.]